Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

Preservation Restrictions

66-9-101. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Historically significant” means any structure more than fifty (50) years old; and

“Preservation restriction” means a right, whether or not stated in the form of a restriction, easement, covenant or condition, in any deed, will or other instrument executed by or on behalf of the owner of the land or in any order of taking, appropriate to preservation of either a structure or a structure and the land upon which such structure is located, historically significant for its architecture or archaeology, to prohibit or limit any or all of the following:

Alterations in exterior or interior features of the structure;

Changes in appearance or condition of the land upon which such structure is located;

Uses not historically appropriate; or

Other acts or uses detrimental to appropriate preservation of the structure, or land upon which such structure is located.

Acts 1979, ch. 45, § 1; T.C.A., §64-9-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-309.

66-9-102. Enforceability of preservation restrictions.

No preservation restriction held by any governmental body or by any nonprofit corporation or trust not for profit shall be unenforceable because of lack of privity of estate or contract, or lack of benefit to particular land, or assignability of the benefit.

Acts 1979, ch. 45, § 2; T.C.A., §64-9-102.

66-9-103. Enforcement of preservation restriction — Entry on land — Recovery of damages.

A preservation restriction may be enforced by injunction or other proceeding in equity, and shall entitle representatives of the holder of such restriction to enter the land in a reasonable manner and at reasonable times to assure compliance. Nothing in this section shall prevent the holder from also recovering any damages to which the holder may otherwise be entitled.

Acts 1979, ch. 45, § 3; T.C.A., §64-9-103.